North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 2. Appellate Division Organization.

§ 7A-5.
Organization.

The appellate division of the General Court of Justice consists of the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals.

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1967, c. 108, s. 1.

§ 7A-6.
Appellate division reporters; reports.

The Supreme Court shall appoint one or more reporters for the appellate division, to serve at its pleasure. It shall be the duty of the reporters to prepare for publication the opinions of the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals. The salary of the reporters shall be fixed by the Administrative Officer of the Courts, subject to the approval of the Supreme Court.

The Administrative Officer of the Courts shall contract for the printing of the reports of the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals, and for the advance sheets of each court. He shall select a printer for the reports and prescribe such contract terms as will insure issuance of the reports as soon as practicable after a sufficient number of opinions are filed. He shall make such contract after consultation with the Department of Administration and comparison of prices for similar work in other states to such an extent as may be practicable. He shall also sell the reports and advance sheets of the appellate division, to the general public, at a price not less than cost nor more than cost plus ten percent (10%), to be fixed by him in his discretion. Proceeds of such sales shall be remitted to the State treasury.

(b1)

In addition to and as an alternative to the provisions for the publication and sale of the appellate division reports of subsection (a) and subsection (b) of this section, the Supreme Court may designate a commercial law publisher’s reports and advance sheets of the opinions of the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals as the Official Reports of the Appellate Division, or the Administrative Officer of the Courts, with the approval of the Supreme Court, may contract with a commercial law publisher or publishers to act as printer and vendor of the reports and advance sheets of the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals upon such terms as the Supreme Court deems advisable after consultation with the Department of Administration.

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-40, s. 1, effective June 22, 2018.

History.

1967, c. 108, s. 1; c. 691, s. 57; 1969, c. 1190, s. 1; 1971, c. 377, s. 2; 1975, c. 879, s. 46; 1977, c. 721, s. 1; 1987, c. 404; 2018-40, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2018-40, s. 1, effective June 22, 2018, repealed subsection (c).

§ 7A-7.
Law clerks; secretaries and stenographers.

Each justice and judge of the appellate division is entitled to the services of not more than two research assistants, who must be graduates of an accredited law school. The salaries of research assistants shall be set by the Administrative Officer of the Courts, subject to the approval of the Supreme Court.

The Administrative Officer of the Courts shall determine the number and salaries of all secretaries and stenographers in the appellate division.

History.

1967, c. 108, s. 1; 1985, c. 698, s. 8(a).

§§ 7A-8,
7A-9.

Reserved for future codification purposes.